Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB156.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 403 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 403. Uniformity in Administration of Assistance; Regulations as to Assistance.--* * *(h) The department shall check, on a quarterly basis, income and employment records held by the Department of Labor and Industry against recipients of medical assistance and benefits from the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617